Missouri, session 2026, HB1631.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 137.090, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 137.090, to read as follows:
137.090. 1. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all tangible personal
property of whatever nature and character situate in a county other than the one in which the
owner resides shall be assessed in the county where the owner resides[; except that,].
(2) The following items of tangible personal property used for lodging shall be
assessed in the county where the items are located:
(a) Houseboats[,];
(b) Cabin cruisers[, floating boat docks,]; and
(c) Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010[, used for lodging].
(3) The following items of tangible personal property shall be assessed in the
county where [they] the items are located[,]:
(a) Floating boat docks; and
(b) Boats. As used in this paragraph, "boats" includes only motorboats and
vessels as the terms "motorboat" and "vessel" are defined in section 306.010 if such
boats:
a. Are housed or stored outside the owner's county of residence on a lift or in a
marina; and
b. Are not regularly transported to and from the owner's county of residence.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1631 2
(4) Tangible personal property belonging to estates shall be assessed in the county in
which the probate division of the circuit court has jurisdiction.
(5) Tangible personal property, other than motor vehicles as the term is defined in
section 301.010, used exclusively in connection with farm operations of the owner and kept
on the farmland, shall not be assessed by a city, town or village unless the farmland is totally
within the boundaries of the city, town or village.
(6) No tangible personal property shall be simultaneously assessed in more than one
county.
2. The assessed valuation of any tractor or trailer as defined in section 301.010 owned
by an individual, partner, or member and used in interstate commerce must be apportioned to
Missouri based on the ratio of miles traveled in this state to miles traveled in the United States
in interstate commerce during the preceding tax year or on the basis of the most recent annual
mileage figures available.
✔